Utah statutes.
7-3-30.   Board of directors to manage business -- Residency of directors.
The business and affairs of a corporation conducting a banking business shall
be managed by its board of directors. Directors are not required to be
residents of this state or shareholders of the corporation unless its articles
of incorporation or bylaws so require.
